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DI−130 −DIAGNOSTICS ABS&VEHICLESTABILITYCONTROL(VSC)&
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

LAND CRUISER (W/G) SUP (RM731E)

DTC Always ON Malfunction in ECU
VSC TRC Warning Light Circuit

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

AlwaysON There isamalfunction in theECUinternal circuit.
SPowersourcecircuit
SABS&BA&TRC&VSCECU
SVSCTRCwarning lightcircuit

Fail safe function:
If trouble occurs in the ECU, the ECU prohibits ABS & BA & TRC & VSC controls and the brake system be-
comes normal.
HINT:
If fail safe function is activated in VSC system, ”VSC OFF” indicator light lights up.

WIRING DIAGRAM
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Checkthat theECUconnectorsaresecurelyconnectedto theECU.

NO Connect the connector to the ECU.

YES

2 Is DTC output for VSC?

Check DTC on page DI−4.

YES Repair circuit indicated by the output code.

NO

3 Does VSC TRC warning light go off?

YES Check for open or short circuit in harness and
connector between ECU−IG fuse and ECU (See
page IN−35).

NO

4 Check battery voltage.

PREPARATION:
Start the engine.
CHECK:
Check the battery voltage.
OK:

Voltage: 10 − 16 V

NG Check and repair the charging system.

OK
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5 Check operation of the VSC TRC warning light.

Incaseofusingthehand −held tester:
PREPARATION:
(a)Connect thehand −held tester to theDLC3.
(b)Turn the ignitionswitchONandpush thehand −held testermainswitchON.
(c)Select theACTIVETESTmodeon thehand −held tester.
CHECK:
Check that ”ON” and ”OFF” of the VSC TRC warning light can be shown on the combination meter on the
hand−held tester.

Incaseofnotusingthehand −held tester:
PREPARATION:
(a) Turn the ignition switch OFF.
(b) Disconnect the connector from the ABS & BA & TRC & VSC ECU.
(c) Turn the ignition switch ON.
CHECK:
Check the VSC TRC warning light goes off.

NG Check and replace combination meter (See
page BE−1).

OK

Check and replace ABS & BA & TRC & VSC
ECU.


